Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.901

Implementation—Effective dates—1988 c 107.

(1) The state health care authority shall be established and shall take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is fully implemented on October 1, 1988.

There is hereby appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 1989, the sum of one million three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as is necessary, to the office of the governor from the state employees' insurance administrative account, for the purposes of implementing this subsection.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section, RCW 48.14.027 and 82.04.4331, and sections 13 and 31, chapter 107, Laws of 1988 are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect March 16, 1988.

(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect on October 1, 1988.

[ 1988 c 107 s 36.]